North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 22. The Public Health Study Commission. [Repealed]

§§ 120-195 through 120-203.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-195; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-196; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(a), (b); 1997-502, s. 11; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-197; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-198; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-199; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-200; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-201; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-202; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-203; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 771, ss. 2.1, 8.1; 1995, c. 358, s. 6; c. 437, s. 4; c. 467, s. 3; c. 507, s. 23A.6(b); repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.16(a), effective July 1, 2011 and 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011.